Yamls/Pron-bydos_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
#  The were proofread for golden standard by Larisa Ponomareva 2019-10-22
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


   Pronoun – быдӧс: # Total Pronoun 'Kaikki / Всё'
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Nom: быдӧс
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Acc: быдӧс
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Gen: быдӧслӧн
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Abl: быдӧслісь
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Dat: быдӧслӧ
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ins: быдӧсӧн 
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Com: быдӧскӧт
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Car: быдӧстӧг
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cns: быдӧсла
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cmpr: быдӧсся
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ine: быдӧсын
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ela: быдӧсісь
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ill: быдӧсӧ
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Apr: быдӧслань
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Egr: быдӧссянь
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Prl: быдӧсӧт
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerI: быдӧсӧдз
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerII: быдӧсви
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIne: быдӧсланьын
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEla: быдӧсланись
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIll: быдӧсланьӧ
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEgr: быдӧсланьсянь
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprPrl: быдӧсланьӧт
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerI: быдӧсланьӧдз
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerII: быдӧсланьви


    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: быдӧсыс
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: быдӧссӧ
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: быдӧсыслӧн
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: быдӧсыслісь
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: быдӧсыслӧ
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: быдӧснас 
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Com+PxSg3: быдӧсыскӧт
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Car+PxSg3: быдӧсыстӧг
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: быдӧсысла
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: быдӧсысся
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: быдӧсас
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: быдӧссис
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: быдӧсас
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: быдӧсыслань
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: быдӧсыссянь
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: [быдӧсӧттяс, быдӧсӧттис]
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerI+PxSg3: [быдӧсӧдззас, быдӧсӧдззис]
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerII+PxSg3: быдӧсысви
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIne+PxSg3: [быдӧсысланьын, быдӧсланяс]
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEla+PxSg3: [быдӧсысланись, быдӧсланьсис]
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIll+PxSg3: [быдӧсысланьӧ, быдӧсланяс]
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg3: быдӧсысланьсянь
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg3: быдӧсысланьӧт
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg3: быдӧсысланьӧдз
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg3: быдӧсысланьви
